Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Center for African Immigrants and Refugees Organization (CAIRO) to administer the Fursad Fund Initiative. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (a) Money appropriated under this section must be used for grants or loans to support small businesses that: new text end new text begin (1) are located outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) are owned by historically underserved entrepreneurs, including immigrants, refugees, and communities of color; and new text end new text begin (3) have fewer than 25 employees and demonstrate a financial need for capital investment or technical assistance. new text end new text begin Technical assistance services shall be provided regardless of financing status to ensure that all entrepreneurs receive necessary business support. new text end new text begin (b) Grants or loans made under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) technical assistance and business coaching, including: (i) providing individualized mentorship, business planning, and financial literacy training; and (ii) offering industry-specific workshops and coaching to strengthen business operations; new text end new text begin (2) capacity building for entrepreneurs, including: (i) assisting small businesses in navigating regulatory processes and financial planning; and (ii) expanding networking and peer-to-peer learning opportunities; and new text end new text begin (3) access to capital through direct lending, including: (i) establishing a microloan fund tailored to small businesses in greater Minnesota; and (ii) offering alternative lending models for entrepreneurs who require culturally aligned financial solutions. new text end new text begin (c) CAIRO, in collaboration with the commissioner of employment and economic development, shall submit a report to the legislature by July 1, 2027, detailing: new text end new text begin (1) the number of businesses served and their geographic distribution; new text end new text begin (2) the amount of capital deployed and loan repayment rates; new text end new text begin (3) the job creation impact and revenue growth of supported businesses; and new text end new text begin (4) recommendations for program improvements and potential expansion. new text end new text begin (d) The report under paragraph (c) must include the following information to determine the efficacy of the program: new text end new text begin (1) the number of small businesses receiving technical assistance and mentorship; new text end new text begin (2) the percentage of businesses accessing capital through direct lending programs; new text end new text begin (3) the growth in revenue, employment, and sustainability of participating businesses; and new text end new text begin (4) the regional economic impact, including increased economic activity in greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Employment and Economic Development shall oversee funding distribution and ensure compliance with state and federal reporting requirements. new text end